Hawaii statutes.
[§171-142] Lease for lessees dislocated by
condemnation proceedings. (a) For purposes of this section:

(1) "Dislocated lessee" means any lessee
engaged in commercial or industrial uses who has been or will be displaced from
private property which is acquired by the State or any county for public use by
the power of eminent domain or threat thereof; and

(2) "Eligible relocation site" means a site
in an industrial park created under this chapter or on other state land,
designated as an appropriate relocation site for dislocated lessees by law, or
by resolution adopted by the board of land and natural resources and approved
by the legislature by concurrent resolution.

(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
any dislocated lessee shall have the right of first refusal to enter into a
lease for an eligible relocation site.

(c) The board shall issue a lease to a
dislocated lessee for an eligible relocation site under mutually agreeable
terms, conditions, and lease rent. The lease shall be issued through
negotiations, without regard to the limitations set forth in section 171-16(c)
and section 171-59(a). The terms, conditions and rent under the lease shall be
in conformance with chapter 171, and the board shall include lease covenants in
each lease for the placement and construction of improvements in accordance
with minimum standards established by applicable county building codes.

(d) The board shall negotiate in good faith
with each dislocated lessee. If the board and dislocated lessee cannot agree
to a lease within one hundred and eighty days from the date the dislocated
lessee receives notice of the availability of an eligible relocation site, the
board shall have no further obligation to negotiate with or issue a lease to
the dislocated lessee for that economic unit, and may issue a lease for the
economic unit to another person after the one hundred and eighty-day period
according to the provisions of chapter 171. [L 1990, c 274, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next